sl-SI: Material za embalažo: Aluminij; Vrečka v škatli; Karton ali lepenka; Steklo; Plastika (PET); Plastika (rPET); Nerjavno jeklo; Tetra Pak; Drugo
ru: Материал упаковки: Алюминий; Пакет в коробке (Bag-in-box); Картон или плотная бумага; Стекло; Пластик (ПЭТ); Пластик (rPET); Нержавеющая сталь; Тетра Пак; Другое
it: Materiale di imballaggio: Alluminio; Bag-in-box; Cartone o cartoncino; Vetro; Plastica (PET); Plastica (rPET); Acciaio inossidabile; Tetra Pak; Altro
ko: 포장 소재: 알루미늄; 백인박스; 카톤 또는 판지; 유리; 플라스틱(PET); 플라스틱(rPET); 스테인리스 스틸; 테트라 팩; 기타
nl: Verpakkingsmateriaal: Aluminium; Bag-in-box; Karton; Glas; Plastic (PET); Plastic (rPET); Roestvrij staal; Tetra-pak; Overige
en: Packaging material: Aluminum; Bag-in-box; Carton or paperboard; Glass; Plastic (PET); Plastic (rPET); Stainless steel; Tetra pack; Other
sv: Förpackningsmaterial: Aluminium; Bag-in-box; Kartong eller papp; Glas; Plast (PET); Plast (rPET); Rostfritt stål; Tetra pack; Övrigt
es: Material de embalaje: Aluminio; Bag-in-box; Caja de cartón o cartón; Vidrio; Plástico (PET); Plástico (rPET); Acero inoxidable; Tetra Brik; Otro
ja: パッケージ素材: アルミニウム; バッグインボックス; カートンまたは板紙; ガラス; プラスチック (PET); プラスチック (rPET); ステンレススチール; テトラパック; その他
fi: Pakkausmateriaali: Alumiini; Bag-in-box (hanapakkaus); Kartonki tai pahvi; Lasi; Muovi (PET); Muovi (rPET); Ruostumaton teräs; Tetra Pak; Muu
fr: Matériau du conditionnement: Aluminium; Bag-in-box; Carton; Verre; Plastique (PET); Plastique (rPET); Acier inoxydable; Tetra Pak; Autre
th: วัสดุบรรจุภัณฑ์: อะลูมิเนียม; ถุงในกล่อง; กล่องกระดาษหรือกระดาษแข็ง; แก้ว; พลาสติก (PET); พลาสติก (rPET); สเตนเลสสตีล; เต็ดตราแพ้ค; อื่นๆ
de: Verpackungsmaterial: Aluminium; Bag-in-Box; Karton oder Pappe; Glas; Kunststoff (PET); Kunststoff (rPET); Edelstahl; Tetra Pak; Sonstige
pt-PT: material: Alumínio; Bag-in-box; Cartão ou papelão; Vidro; Plástico (PET); Plástico (rPET); Aço inoxidável; Tetra Pak; Outro
pl: Materiał opakowania: Aluminium; Bag-in-box; Karton lub tektura; Szkło; Plastik (PET); Plastik (rPET); Stal nierdzewna; Tetra Pak; Inne
lt-LT: Pakuotės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Maišelis dėžutėje; Kartonas arba kartono plokštė; Stiklas; Plastikas (PET); Plastikas (rPET); Nerūdijantysis plienas; „Tetra pak“; Kita
ro-RO: Material de ambalare: Aluminiu; Bag-in-box; Carton; Sticlă; Plastic (PET); Plastic (rPET); Oțel inoxidabil; Tetra pack; Altele
hu: Csomagolóanyag: Alumínium; Bag-in-box; Karton vagy papírlemez; Üveg; Műanyag (PET); Műanyag (rPET); Rozsdamentes acél; Tetra Pak; Egyéb
cs: Obalový materiál: Hliník; Bag-in-box; Karton nebo lepenka; Sklo; Plast (PET); Plast (rPET); Nerezová ocel; Tetra Pak; Ostatní
da: Emballagemateriale: Aluminium; Bag-in-box; Karton eller pap; Glas; Plastik (PET); Plastik (rPET); Rustfrit stål; Tetra Pak; Andet
el: Υλικό συσκευασίας: Αλουμίνιο; Ασκός σε κουτί; Χαρτοκιβώτιο ή χαρτόνι; Γυαλί; Πλαστικό (PET); Πλαστικό (rPET); Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Tetra pack; Άλλο
sk-SK: Materiál balenia: Hliník; Bag-in-box; Kartón alebo lepenka; Sklo; Plast (PET); Plast (rPET); Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Tetra Pak; Iné
pt-BR: Embalagem material: Alumínio; Bag-in-box; Cartão ou papelão; Vidro; Plástico (PET); Plástico (rPET); Aço inoxidável; Tetra Pak; Outros
vi: Vật liệu đóng gói: Nhôm; Túi trong hộp; Carton hoặc bìa cứng; Thủy tinh; Nhựa (PET); Nhựa (rPET); Thép không gỉ; Tetra Pak; Khác
zh-TW: 包裝材質: 鋁; 盒中袋; 紙箱或紙板; 玻璃; 塑膠 (PET); 塑膠 (rPET); 不鏽鋼; 利樂包; 其他
zh-CN: 包装材料: 铝; 盒中袋; 纸箱或纸板; 玻璃; 塑料 (PET); 塑料 (rPET); 不锈钢; 利乐包; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на опаковката: Алуминий; Кутия с торбичка (Bag-in-box); Кашон или картон; Стъкло; Пластмаса (PET); Пластмаса (rPET); Неръждаема стомана; Тетра Пак; Друго
tr: Ambalaj malzemesi: Alüminyum; Kutu içi torba; Karton veya mukavva; Cam; Plastik (PET); Plastik (rPET); Paslanmaz çelik; Tetra Pak; Diğer
nb: Emballasjemateriale: Aluminium; Bag-in-box; Kartong eller papp; Glass; Plast (PET); Plast (rPET); Rustfritt stål; Tetrapak; Annet
hr-HR: Materijal za pakiranje: Aluminij; Bag-in-box; Karton ili ljepenka; Staklo; Plastika (PET); Plastika (rPET); Nehrđajući čelik; Tetra pak; Ostalo